Utah statutes.
78B-6-1308.   Right of entry pending action for purposes of action.

The court in which an action is pending under this part or for damages for an injury to property may, on motion and upon notice to either party, for good cause shown, issue an order allowing a party the right to enter the property and take surveys and measurements including any tunnels, shafts, or drifts, even though entry must be made through other lands belonging to parties to the action.

